District of Columbia statutes.
16-712

Community service.

(a)

In criminal cases in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia, the court may, in addition to any other sentence imposed, require a person convicted of any offense as a condition of probation or as a sentence itself, to undertake reasonable services to the community for a period not to exceed 5 years in duration.

(b)

When community service is ordered, the court shall take into consideration the physical and mental health of the defendant, his or her age, education, employment and vocational training, family circumstances, financial condition, and any other factors as shall be appropriate.

(c)

The court shall fix the manner of performing community service.

(d)

At any time during the probation period or period of community service, the defendant may request and the court may grant a hearing on any matter related to the plan of community service.

History

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-202, § 2, 30 DCR 173

Cross References

Panhandling, community service sanctions, see § 22-2304.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 22-2304 and § 22-3312.04.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-712.